New Jersey, session 222, A4059.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 2 of P.L.1993, c.299 (C.12:7-63) is amended to read as follows: 2.    A person shall not operate a personal watercraft: a.     On the waters of this State between sunset and sunrise, or during any time of restricted visibility as determined by an agent or officer of the Marine [Law Enforcement] Service Bureau, Division of State Police; b.    Within the confines of the Point Pleasant Canal in the County of Ocean, or the Cape May Canal in the County of Cape May; c.     Above minimum headway speed within 100 feet of: (1)   Buoys or signs that mark the boundaries of a swimming area; (2)   The shoreline; (3)   Any person in the water; or (4)   Residential dwelling units; or d.    In such a manner as to make the vessel completely leave the water or otherwise become airborne within 100 feet of another vessel. e.     The provisions of this section shall not apply to any of the following persons while in actual performance of their official duties: a law enforcement officer, a member of a paid, part paid, or volunteer fire department, a member of a State, county, or municipal beach patrol, or a person trained and certified or licensed to provide emergency medical care, whether on a paid or volunteer basis. (cf: P.L.2009, c.108, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.